src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
! THIS FAR 2017-06-29 +Err/Dial
LEXICON CASEPOSSLEX-AFTERDERIVATION_Ӧ
+Acc:%>ӧс K ;
+Ins:%>ӧн PredMonLex ;
+Ine:%>ын SPAT-COMPARATIVE ;
+Ela:%>ысь SPAT-COMPARATIVE ;
+Ill:%>ӧ IllCompar ;
+Prl:%>ӧд K ;
+Ter:%>ӧдз K ;

!! SG1
+Nom+PxSg1:%>ӧй K ;
+Gen+PxSg1:%>ӧйлӧн K ;
+Abl+PxSg1:%>ӧйлысь K ;
+Dat+PxSg1:%>ӧйлы K ;
+Acc+PxSg1:%>ӧс K ;
+Com+PxSg1:%>ӧйкӧд K ;
+Car+PxSg1:%>ӧйтӧг K ;
+Cns+PxSg1:%>ӧйла K ;
+Cmpr+PxSg1:%>ӧйся K ;
+Apr+PxSg1:%>ӧйлань SPAT-COMPARATIVE ;
+Egr+PxSg1:%>ӧйсянь SPAT-COMPARATIVE ;
+Prl+PxSg1:%>ӧдым K ;
+Ter+PxSg1:%>ӧдзым K ;
+AprEgr+PxSg1:%>ӧйланьсянь SPAT-COMPARATIVE ;

!! SG2
+Nom+PxSg2:%>ыд K ;
+Gen+PxSg2:%>ыдлӧн K ;
+Abl+PxSg2:%>ыдлысь K ;
+Dat+PxSg2:%>ыдлы K ;
+Com+PxSg2:%>ыдкӧд K ;
+Com+PxSg2:%>кӧдыд K ;
+Cns+PxSg2:%>ыдла K ;
+Prl+PxSg2:%>ӧдыд K ;
+Ter+PxSg2:%>ӧдзыд K ;

!! SG3
+Nom+PxSg3:%>ыс K ;
+Gen+PxSg3:%>ыслӧн K ;
+Abl+PxSg3:%>ыслысь K ;
+Dat+PxSg3:%>ыслы K ;
+Com+PxSg3:%>ыскӧд K ;
+Com+PxSg3:%>кӧдыс K ;
+Cns+PxSg3:%>ысла K ;
+Prl+PxSg3:%>ӧдыс K ;
+Ter+PxSg3:%>ӧдзыс K ;

!! PL1
+Prl+PxPl1:%>ӧдным K ;
+Ter+PxPl1:%>ӧдзным K ;

!! PL2
+Prl+PxPl2:%>ӧдныд K ;
+Ter+PxPl2:%>ӧдзныд K ;

!! PL3
+Prl+PxPl3:%>ӧдныс K ;
+Ter+PxPl3:%>ӧдзныс K ;


!! !!Case

LEXICON Noun1-IS_INE
+N+Ine: SPAT-COMPARATIVE ;

LEXICON DERIVEDADJ
+Der/са+IneMod:%>са A_ ;
+Der/тӧм+AbeMod:%>тӧм A_ ;
+Der/а+HabObjMod:%>а A_ ;
+Der/ся+TempMod:%>ся A_ ;
+Der/увса:%>увса A_ ;
+Der/сайса:%>сайса A_ ;
+Der/пӧвстса:%>пӧвстса A_ ;
+Der/костса:%>костса A_ ;
+Der/бердса:%>бердса A_ ;
+Der/бӧрса:%>бӧрса A_ ;
+Der/весьтса:%>весьтса A_ ;
+Der/водзса:%>водзса A_ ;
+Der/вывса:%>вывса A_ ;
+Der/гӧгӧрса:%>гӧгӧрса A_ ;
+Der/дорса:%>дорса A_ ;




LEXICON AdjCompar
+Der/джык+Comp:%>джык PredMonLex ;
+Der/джык+Comp+Der/а:%>джыка ADV_ ;
+Der/джык+Comp+Der/MWN+N+Sg:%>джык CASEPOSSLEX-afterDerivation ;
+Der/джык+Comp+Der/MWN+N+Pl:%>джыкъяс CASEPOSSLEX-afterDerivation ;
+Der/MWN+N+Sg: CASEPOSSLEX-afterDerivation ; !This is for adjectives without nouns
+Der/MWN+N+Pl:%>ъяс CASEPOSSLEX-afterDerivation ; !This is for adjectives without nouns

LEXICON IllCompar
 K ;
+Der/джык+Comp:%>джык K ;

LEXICON PredMonLex-Spat
 K ;      ! Singular predicative
 PredMonLex-Spat-Add-Morphology ; !

LEXICON PredMonLex-Spat-Add-Morphology ! This allows consistency
                                       ! with SPAT elsewhere
+Cop+Pl:%>ӧсь K ; ! Plural predicative.
+Der/джык+Comp:%>джык PredMonLex ; !ывлаынджык OR ывлаынджыкӧсь


LEXICON PredMonLex
 K ;      ! Singular predicative
+Cop+Pl:%>ӧсь K ; ! Plural predicative.
!! 2012-02-07 !!+Der/а+Adv:%>а K ;




! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
